Utah statutes.
19-3-319.   State response to nuclear release and hazards.
(1)  The state finds that the placement of high-level nuclear waste inside the
exterior boundaries of the state is an ultra-hazardous activity which may
result in catastrophic economic and environmental damage and irreparable human
injury in the event of a release of waste, and which may result in serious
long-term health effects to workers at any transfer or storage facility, or to
workers involved in the transportation of the waste.
(2) (a)  The state finds that procedures for providing funding for the costs
incurred by any release of waste, or for the compensation for the costs of
long-term health effects are not adequately addressed by existing law.
(b)  Due to these concerns, the state has established a restricted account
under Subsection 19-3-309(3), known as the Nuclear Accident and Hazard
Compensation Account, and referred to in this section as the compensation
account.  One of the purposes of this account is to partially or wholly
compensate workers for these potential costs, as funds are available and
appropriated for these purposes.
(3) (a)  The department shall require the applicant, and parent and subsidiary
organizations of the applicant, to pay to the department not less than 75% of
the unfunded potential liability, as determined under Subsection 19-3-301(5),
in the form of cash or cash equivalents.  The payment shall be made within 30
days after the date of the issuance of a license under this part.
(b)  The department shall credit the amount due under Subsection 19-3-306(10)
against the amount due under this Subsection (3).
(c)  If the payments due under this Subsection (3) are not made within 30
days, as required, the executive director of the department shall cancel the
license.
(4) (a)  The department shall also require an annual fee from the holder of
any license issued under this part.  This annual fee payment shall be
calculated as:
(i)  the aggregate amount of the annual payments required by Title 34A,
Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act, of the licensee and of all parties
contracted to provide goods, services, or municipal-type services to the
licensee, regarding their employees who are working within the state at any
time during the calendar year; and
(ii)  multiplied by the number of storage casks of waste present at any time
and for any period of time within the exterior borders of the state during the
year for which the fee is assessed.
(b) (i)  The licensee shall pay the fee under Subsection (4)(a) to the
department.  The department shall deposit the fee in the compensation account
created in Subsection 19-3-309(3).
(ii)  The fee shall be paid to the department on or before March 31 of each
calendar year.
(5)  The department shall use the fees paid under Subsection (4) to provide
medical or death benefits, or both, as is appropriate to the situation, to the
following persons for death or any long term health conditions of an employee
proximately caused by the presence of the high-level nuclear waste or greater
than class C radioactive waste within the state, or a release of this waste
within the state that affects an employee's physical health:
(a)  any employee of the holder of any license issued under this part, or
employees of any parties contracting to provide goods, services,
transportation, or municipal-type services to the licensee, if the employee is
within the state at any time during the calendar year as part of his
employment; or
(b)  that employee's family or beneficiaries.
(6)  Payment of the fee under Subsection (4) does not exempt the licensee from
compliance with any other provision of law, including Title 34A, Chapter 2,
regarding workers' compensation.
(7) (a)  An agreement between an employer and an employee, the employee's
family, or beneficiaries requiring the employee to waive benefits under this
section, requiring the employee to seek third party coverage, or requiring an
employee contribution is void.
(b)  Any employer attempting to secure any agreement prohibited under
Subsection (7)(a) is subject to the penalties of Section 19-3-312.
(8) (a)  The department, in consultation with the Division of Industrial
Accidents within the Labor Commission, shall by rule establish procedures
regarding application for benefits, standards for eligibility, estimates of
annual payments, and payments.
(b)  Payments under this section are in addition to any other payments or
benefits allowed by state or federal law, notwithstanding provisions in Title
34A, Chapter 2, regarding workers' compensation.
(c)  Payments or obligations to pay under this section may not exceed funds
appropriated for these purposes by the Legislature.
(9) (a)  Any fee or payment imposed under this section does not apply to any
Utah-based nonprofit trade association due to the membership in the
organization of a member that is engaging in, or attempting to engage in, the
placement of high-level nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive
waste at a storage facility or transfer facility within the state.
(b)  Subsection (9)(a) does not apply to a nonprofit trade association if that
association takes any affirmative action to promote or assist any individual
or organization in efforts to conduct any activity prohibited by this part.
(c)  A member of any Utah-based nonprofit trade association is not exempt from
any fee or payment under this section due to membership in the association.
